Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Chapter 8 Uniform Trustees' Powers Act [Repealed]

§§ 4-8-101 through 4-8-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present law, see §

4-10-801

et seq. and especially

4-10-816

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 54, §§ 1-10, Laws 1973, ch. 101, § 1, and Laws 1993, ch. 52, § 1, related to the Uniform Trustees' Powers Act.